North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-32 Administrative Agencies Practice Act

Note.

This chapter, enacted by section 12 of chapter 293, S.L. 2001, effective August 1, 2001, replaces former Chapter 28-32, entitled “Administrative Agencies Practice Act,” which was repealed by section 35 of chapter 293, S.L. 2001.

28-32-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise provides:

“Adjudicative proceeding” means an administrative matter resulting in an agency issuing an order after an opportunity for hearing is provided or required. An adjudicative proceeding includes administrative matters involving a hearing on a complaint against a specific-named respondent; a hearing on an application seeking a right, privilege, or an authorization from an agency, such as a ratemaking or licensing hearing; or a hearing on an appeal to an agency. An adjudicative proceeding includes reconsideration, rehearing, or reopening. Once an adjudicative proceeding has begun, the adjudicative proceeding includes any informal disposition of the administrative matter under section 28-32-22 or another specific statute or rule, unless the matter has been specifically converted to another type of proceeding under section 28-32-22. An adjudicative proceeding does not include a decision or order to file or not to file a complaint, or to initiate an investigation, an adjudicative proceeding, or any other proceeding before the agency, or another agency, or a court. An adjudicative proceeding does not include a decision or order to issue, reconsider, or reopen an order that precedes an opportunity for hearing or that under another section of this code is not subject to review in an adjudicative proceeding. An adjudicative proceeding does not include rulemaking under this chapter.

“Administrative agency” or “agency” means each board, bureau, commission, department, or other administrative unit of the executive branch of state government, including one or more officers, employees, or other persons directly or indirectly purporting to act on behalf or under authority of the agency. An administrative unit located within or subordinate to an administrative agency must be treated as part of that agency to the extent it purports to exercise authority subject to this chapter. The term administrative agency does not include:

The office of management and budget except with respect to rules made under section 32-12.2-14, rules relating to conduct on the capitol grounds and in buildings located on the capitol grounds under section 54-21-18, rules relating to the classified service as authorized under section 54-44.3-07, and rules relating to state purchasing practices as required under section 54-44.4-04.

The adjutant general with respect to the department of emergency services.

The council on the arts.

The state auditor.

The department of commerce with respect to the division of economic development and finance.

The dairy promotion commission.

The education factfinding commission.

The kindergarten through grade twelve education coordination council.

The board of equalization.

The board of higher education.

The Indian affairs commission.

The industrial commission with respect to the activities of the Bank of North Dakota, North Dakota housing finance agency, public finance authority, North Dakota mill and elevator association, North Dakota farm finance agency, the North Dakota transmission authority, and the North Dakota pipeline authority.

The department of corrections and rehabilitation except with respect to the activities of the division of adult services under chapter 54-23.4.

The pardon advisory board.

The parks and recreation department.

The parole board.

The state fair association.

The attorney general with respect to activities of the state toxicologist and the state crime laboratory.

The administrative committee on veterans’ affairs except with respect to rules relating to the supervision and government of the veterans’ home and the implementation of programs or services provided by the veterans’ home.

The industrial commission with respect to the lignite research fund except as required under section 57-61-01.5.

The attorney general with respect to guidelines adopted under section 12.1-32-15 for the risk assessment of sexual offenders, the risk level review process, and public disclosure of information under section 12.1-32-15.

The commission on legal counsel for indigents.

The attorney general with respect to twenty-four seven sobriety program guidelines and program fees.

The industrial commission with respect to approving or setting water rates under chapter 61-40.

The board of university and school lands with respect to the adjudicative proceeding requirements and procedures under sections 28-32-21 through 28-32-51.

“Agency head” means an individual or body of individuals in whom the ultimate legal authority of the agency is vested by law.

“Commission” means the North Dakota ethics commission established by article XIV of the Constitution of North Dakota.

“Complainant” means any person who files a complaint before an administrative agency pursuant to section 28-32-21 and any administrative agency that, when authorized by law, files such a complaint before such agency or any other agency.

“Hearing officer” means any agency head or one or more members of the agency head when presiding in an administrative proceeding, or, unless prohibited by law, one or more other persons designated by the agency head to preside in an administrative proceeding, an administrative law judge from the office of administrative hearings, or any other person duly assigned, appointed, or designated to preside in an administrative proceeding pursuant to statute or rule.

“License” means a franchise, permit, certification, approval, registration, charter, or similar form of authorization required by law.

“Order” means any agency action of particular applicability which determines the legal rights, duties, privileges, immunities, or other legal interests of one or more specific persons. The term does not include an executive order issued by the governor.

“Party” means each person named or admitted as a party or properly seeking and entitled as of right to be admitted as a party. An administrative agency may be a party. In a hearing for the suspension, revocation, or disqualification of an operator’s license under title 39, the term may include each city and each county in which the alleged conduct occurred, but the city or county may not appeal the decision of the hearing officer.

“Person” includes an individual, association, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, the commission, a state governmental agency or governmental subdivision, or an agency of such governmental subdivision.

“Relevant evidence” means evidence having any tendency to make the existence of any fact that is of consequence to the determination of the administrative action more probable or less probable than it would be without the evidence.

“Rule” means the whole or a part of an agency or commission statement of general applicability which implements or prescribes law or policy or the organization, procedure, or practice requirements of the agency or commission. The term includes the adoption of new rules and the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an existing rule. The term does not include:

A rule concerning only the internal management of an agency or the commission which does not directly or substantially affect the substantive or procedural rights or duties of any segment of the public.

A rule that sets forth criteria or guidelines to be used by the staff of an agency or the commission in the performance of audits, investigations, inspections, and settling commercial disputes or negotiating commercial arrangements, or in the defense, prosecution, or settlement of cases, if the disclosure of the rule would:

Enable law violators to avoid detection;

Facilitate disregard of requirements imposed by law; or

Give a clearly improper advantage to persons who are in an adverse position to the state.

A rule establishing specific prices to be charged for particular goods or services sold by an agency.

A rule concerning only the physical servicing, maintenance, or care of agency-owned, agency-operated, commission-owned, or commission-operated facilities or property.

A rule relating only to the use of a particular facility or property owned, operated, or maintained by the state or any of its subdivisions, if the substance of the rule is adequately indicated by means of signs or signals to persons who use the facility or property.

A rule concerning only inmates of a correctional or detention facility, students enrolled in an educational institution, or patients admitted to a hospital, if adopted by that facility, institution, or hospital.

A form whose contents or substantive requirements are prescribed by rule or statute or are instructions for the execution or use of the form.

An agency or commission budget.

An opinion of the attorney general.

A rule adopted by an agency selection committee under section 54-44.7-03.

Any material, including a guideline, interpretive statement, statement of general policy, manual, brochure, or pamphlet, which is explanatory and not intended to have the force and effect of law.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 140, § 2; 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2001, ch. 501, § 4; 2001, ch. 488, § 18; 2003, ch. 174, § 5; 2003, ch. 469, § 3; 2003, ch. 493, § 1; 2005, ch. 16, § 11; 2005, ch. 89, § 29; 2005, ch. 195, § 13; 2005, ch. 406, § 14; 2005, ch. 538, § 6; 2007, ch. 464, § 1; 2009, ch. 469, § 3; 2013, ch. 490, § 1; 2017, ch. 227, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 144, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 265, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 472, § 6, effective May 2, 2019.

Note.

Section 35 of chapter 293, S.L. 2001 repeals former Chapter 28-32, as it existed on December 31, 2000. Section 12 of chapter 293, S.L. 2001 enacts a new Chapter 28-32, effective for administrative rules for which the notice of rulemaking is filed with the office of the legislative council after July 31, 2001, pursuant to section 36 of 293, S.L. 2001.

28-32-02.
Rulemaking power of agency — Organizational rule.

The authority of an administrative agency to adopt administrative rules is authority delegated by the legislative assembly. As part of that delegation, the legislative assembly reserves to itself the authority to determine when and if rules of administrative agencies are effective. Every administrative agency may adopt, amend, or repeal reasonable rules in conformity with this chapter and any statute administered or enforced by the agency. An administrative agency may not adopt a rule that prescribes a criminal penalty unless authorized by another chapter.

In addition to other rulemaking requirements imposed by law, each agency may include in its rules a description of that portion of its organization and functions subject to this chapter and may include a statement of the general course and method of its operations and how the public may obtain information or make submissions or requests.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2011, ch. 233, § 1; 2019, ch. 266, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Adoption of rules by state livestock sanitary board, see § 36-01-08.

Procedure on regulation of public utilities, see chapter 49-05.

28-32-03.
Emergency rules.

If the agency, with the approval of the governor, or the commission finds that emergency rulemaking is necessary, the commission or agency may declare the proposed rule to be an interim final rule effective on a date no earlier than the date of filing with the legislative council of the notice required by section 28-32-10.

A proposed rule may be given effect on an emergency basis under this section if any of the following grounds exists regarding that rule:

Imminent peril threatens public health, safety, or welfare, which would be abated by emergency effectiveness;

A delay in the effective date of the rule is likely to cause a loss of funds appropriated to support a duty imposed by law upon the commission or agency;

Emergency effectiveness is reasonably necessary to avoid a delay in implementing an appropriations measure; or

Emergency effectiveness is necessary to meet a mandate of federal law.

A final rule adopted after consideration of all written and oral submissions respecting the interim final rule, which is substantially similar to the interim final rule, is effective as of the declared effective date of the interim final rule.

The commission’s or agency’s finding, and a brief statement of the commission’s or agency’s reasons for the finding, must be filed with the legislative council with the final adopted emergency rule.

The commission or agency shall attempt to make interim final rules known to persons who the commission or agency can reasonably be expected to believe may have a substantial interest in them. As used in this subsection, “substantial interest” means an interest in the effect of the rules which surpasses the common interest of all citizens. The commission or an agency adopting emergency rules shall comply with the notice requirements of section 28-32-10 which relate to emergency rules and shall provide notice to the chairman of the administrative rules committee of the emergency status, declared effective date, and grounds for emergency status of the rules under subsection 2. When notice of emergency rule adoption is received, the legislative council shall publish the notice and emergency rules on its website.

An interim final rule is ineffective one hundred eighty days after its declared effective date unless first adopted as a final rule.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2001, ch. 294, § 1; 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 20; 2011, ch. 234, § 1; 2019, ch. 472, § 7, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-04.
Repeal or waiver of rules from federal guidelines.

An agency shall repeal or amend any existing rule that was adopted from federal guidelines and which is not relevant to state regulatory programs.

An agency may not adopt rules from federal guidelines which are not relevant to state regulatory programs when developing or modifying programs.

An agency shall seek a waiver from the appropriate United States agency when the United States agency is evaluating current programs or delegating or modifying programs to relieve the agency from complying with or adopting rules that are not relevant to state regulatory programs.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-05.
Adoption by reference of certain rules.

When adopting rules, an agency shall adopt by reference any applicable existing permit or procedural rules that may be adapted for use in a new or existing program.

An agency shall seek authorization from the appropriate United States agency to adopt by reference applicable existing permit or procedural rules that may be adapted for use in a new or existing program when the United States agency is delegating or modifying a program.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-06.
Force and effect of rules.

Upon becoming effective, rules have the force and effect of law until amended or repealed by the agency or commission, declared invalid by a final court decision, suspended or found to be void by the administrative rules committee, or determined repealed by the legislative council because the authority for adoption of the rules is repealed or transferred to another agency.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2009, ch. 482, § 21; 2019, ch. 472, § 8, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-07.
Deadline for rules to implement statutory change.

Any rule change, including a creation, amendment, or repeal, made to implement a statutory change must be adopted and filed with the legislative council within nine months of the effective date of the statutory change. If an agency or the commission needs additional time for the rule change, a request for additional time must be made to the legislative council. The legislative council may extend the time within which the agency or commission must adopt the rule change if the request by the agency or commission is supported by evidence that the agency or commission needs more time through no deliberate fault of its own.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2009, ch. 482, § 22; 2019, ch. 472, § 9, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-08.
Regulatory analysis.

An agency or the commission shall issue a regulatory analysis of a proposed rule if:

Within twenty days after the last published notice date of a proposed rule hearing, a written request for the analysis is filed by the governor or a member of the legislative assembly; or

The proposed rule is expected to have an impact on the regulated community in excess of fifty thousand dollars. The analysis under this subdivision must be available on or before the first date of public notice as provided for in section 28-32-10.

The regulatory analysis must contain:

A description of the classes of persons who probably will be affected by the proposed rule, including classes that will bear the costs of the proposed rule and classes that will benefit from the proposed rule;

A description of the probable impact, including economic impact, of the proposed rule;

The probable costs to the agency or commission of the implementation and enforcement of the proposed rule and any anticipated effect on state revenues; and

A description of any alternative methods for achieving the purpose of the proposed rule that were seriously considered by the agency or commission and the reasons why the methods were rejected in favor of the proposed rule.

Each regulatory analysis must include quantification of the data to the extent practicable.

The agency or commission shall mail or deliver a copy of the regulatory analysis to any person who requests a copy of the regulatory analysis. The agency or commission may charge a fee for a copy of the regulatory analysis as allowed under section 44-04-18.

If required under subsection 1, the preparation and issuance of a regulatory analysis is a mandatory duty of the agency or commission proposing a rule. Errors in a regulatory analysis, including erroneous determinations concerning the impact of the proposed rule on the regulated community, are not a ground upon which the invalidity of a rule may be asserted or declared.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2007, ch. 388, § 1; 2019, ch. 472, § 10, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-08.1.
Rules affecting small entities — Analysis — Economic impact statements — Judicial review.

As used in this section:

“Small business” means a business entity, including its affiliates, which:

Is independently owned and operated; and

Employs fewer than twenty-five full-time employees or has gross annual sales of less than two million five hundred thousand dollars;

“Small entity” includes small business, small organization, and small political subdivision;

“Small organization” means any not-for-profit enterprise that is independently owned and operated and is not dominant in its field; and

“Small political subdivision” means a political subdivision with a population of less than five thousand.

Before adoption of any proposed rule, the adopting agency shall prepare a regulatory analysis in which, consistent with public health, safety, and welfare, the agency considers utilizing regulatory methods that will accomplish the objectives of applicable statutes while minimizing adverse impact on small entities. The agency shall consider each of the following methods of reducing impact of the proposed rule on small entities:

Establishment of less stringent compliance or reporting requirements for small entities;

Establishment of less stringent schedules or deadlines for compliance or reporting requirements for small entities;

Consolidation or simplification of compliance or reporting requirements for small entities;

Establishment of performance standards for small entities to replace design or operational standards required in the proposed rule; and

Exemption of small entities from all or any part of the requirements contained in the proposed rule.

Before adoption of any proposed rule that may have an adverse impact on small entities, the adopting agency shall prepare an economic impact statement that includes consideration of:

The small entities subject to the proposed rule;

The administrative and other costs required for compliance with the proposed rule;

The probable cost and benefit to private persons and consumers who are affected by the proposed rule;

The probable effect of the proposed rule on state revenues; and

Any less intrusive or less costly alternative methods of achieving the purpose of the proposed rule.

For any rule subject to this section, a small entity that is adversely affected or aggrieved by final agency action is entitled to judicial review of agency compliance with the requirements of this section. A small entity seeking judicial review under this section must file a petition for judicial review within one year from the date of final agency action.

This section does not apply to the ethics commission, any agency that is an occupational or professional licensing authority, and the following agencies or divisions of agencies:

Council on the arts.

Beef commission.

Dairy promotion commission.

Dry bean council.

Highway patrolmen’s retirement board.

Indian affairs commission.

Board for Indian scholarships.

State personnel board.

Potato council.

Board of public school education.

Real estate trust account committee.

Seed commission.

Soil conservation committee.

Oilseed council.

Wheat commission.

State seed arbitration board.

North Dakota lottery.

This section does not apply to rules mandated by federal law.

The adopting agency shall provide the administrative rules committee copies of any regulatory analysis or economic impact statement, or both, prepared under this section when the committee is considering the associated rules.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 271, § 1; 2005, ch. 470, § 1; 2019, ch. 472, § 11, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-08.2.
Fiscal notes for rules.

When an agency or the commission presents rules for administrative rules committee consideration, the agency or commission shall provide a fiscal note or a statement in its testimony that the rules have no fiscal effect. A fiscal note must reflect the effect of the rules changes on state revenues and expenditures, including any effect on funds controlled by the agency or commission.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 234, § 2; 2019, ch. 472, § 12, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-09.
Takings assessment.

An agency or the commission shall prepare a written assessment of the constitutional takings implications of a proposed rule that may limit the use of private real property. The assessment must:

Assess the likelihood that the proposed rule may result in a taking or regulatory taking.

Clearly and specifically identify the purpose of the proposed rule.

Explain why the proposed rule is necessary to substantially advance that purpose and why no alternative action is available that would achieve the agency’s or commission’s goals while reducing the impact on private property owners.

Estimate the potential cost to the government if a court determines that the proposed rule constitutes a taking or regulatory taking.

Identify the source of payment within the agency’s or commission’s budget for any compensation that may be ordered.

Certify that the benefits of the proposed rule exceed the estimated compensation costs.

Any private landowner who is or may be affected by a rule that limits the use of the landowner’s private real property may request in writing that the agency or commission reconsider the application or need for the rule. Within thirty days of receiving the request, the agency or commission shall consider the request and shall in writing inform the landowner whether the agency or commission intends to keep the rule in place, modify application of the rule, or repeal the rule.

In an analysis of the takings implications of a proposed rule, “taking” means the taking of private real property, as defined in section 47-01-03, by government action which requires compensation to the owner of that property by the fifth or fourteenth amendment to the Constitution of the United States or section 16 of article I of the Constitution of North Dakota. “Regulatory taking” means a taking of real property through the exercise of the police and regulatory powers of the state which reduces the value of the real property by more than fifty percent. However, the exercise of a police or regulatory power does not effect a taking if it substantially advances legitimate state interests, does not deny an owner economically viable use of the owner’s land, or is in accordance with applicable state or federal law.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2019, ch. 472, § 13, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-10.
Notice of rulemaking — Hearing date.

An agency or the commission shall prepare a full notice and an abbreviated notice of rulemaking.

The full notice of the proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a rule must include a short, specific explanation of the proposed rule and the purpose of the proposed rule, identify the emergency status and declared effective date of any emergency rules, include a determination of whether the proposed rulemaking is expected to have an impact on the regulated community in excess of fifty thousand dollars, identify at least one location where interested persons may review the text of the proposed rule, provide the address to which written comments concerning the proposed rule may be sent, provide the deadline for submission of written comments, provide a telephone number and post-office or electronic mail address at which a copy of the rules and regulatory analysis may be requested, and, in the case of a substantive rule, provide the time and place set for each oral hearing. An agency’s full notice must include a statement of the bill number and general subject matter of any legislation, enacted during the most recent session of the legislative assembly, which is being implemented by the proposed rule. The commission’s full notice must include a statement of the provision of the Constitution of North Dakota or the bill number and general subject matter of any legislation that is being implemented by the proposed rule. The full notice must be filed with the legislative council, accompanied by a copy of the proposed rules.

The agency or commission shall request publication of an abbreviated newspaper publication notice at least once in each official county newspaper published in this state. The abbreviated newspaper publication of notice must be in a display-type format with a minimum width of one column of approximately two inches [5.08 centimeters] and a minimum depth of approximately three inches [7.62 centimeters] and with a headline describing the general topic of the proposed rules. The notice must also include the telephone number or address to use to obtain a copy of the proposed rules, identification of the emergency status and declared effective date of any emergency rules, the address to use and the deadline to submit written comments, and the location, date, and time of the public hearing on the rules.

The agency or commission shall mail or deliver by electronic mail a copy of the full notice and proposed rule to each member of the legislative assembly whose name appeared as a sponsor or cosponsor of legislation, enacted during the most recent session of the legislative assembly, which is being implemented by the proposed rule and to each person who has made a timely request to the agency or commission for a copy of the notice and proposed rule. The agency or commission may mail or otherwise provide a copy of the full notice to any person who is likely to be an interested person. The agency or commission may charge persons who are not members of the legislative assembly fees for copies of the proposed rule as allowed under section 44-04-18.

In addition to the other notice requirements of this subsection, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide notice of any proposed rulemaking by the superintendent of public instruction to each association with statewide membership whose primary focus is elementary and secondary education issues which has requested to receive notice from the superintendent under this subsection and to the superintendent of each public school district in this state, or the president of the school board for school districts that have no superintendent, at least twenty days before the date of the hearing described in the notice. Notice provided by the superintendent of public instruction under this section must be by first-class mail. However, upon request of a group or person entitled to notice under this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide the group or person notice by electronic mail.

The legislative council shall establish standard procedures for the commission and all agencies to follow in complying with the provisions of this section and a procedure to allow any person to request and receive mailed copies of all filings made by agencies and the commission pursuant to this section. The legislative council may charge an annual fee as established by the administrative rules committee for providing copies of the filings.

At least twenty days must elapse between the date of the publication of the notice and the date of the hearing. Within fifteen business days after receipt of a notice under this section, a copy of the notice must be mailed by the legislative council to any person who has paid the annual fee established under subsection 4.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2003, ch. 272, § 1; 2005, ch. 287, § 1; 2005, ch. 288, § 1; 2007, ch. 388, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, § 23; 2011, ch. 234, § 3; 2013, ch. 63, § 6; 2013, ch. 247, § 1; 2019, ch. 472, § 14, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-11.
Conduct of hearings — Notice of administrative rules committee consideration — Consideration and written record of comments.

The agency or commission shall adopt a procedure whereby all interested persons are afforded reasonable opportunity to submit data, views, or arguments, orally or in writing, concerning the proposed rule, including data respecting the impact of the proposed rule. The agency or commission shall adopt a procedure to allow interested parties to request and receive notice from the agency or commission of the date and place the rule will be reviewed by the administrative rules committee. In case of substantive rules, the agency or commission shall conduct an oral hearing. The agency or commission shall consider fully all written and oral submissions respecting a proposed rule prior to the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule not of an emergency nature. The agency or commission shall make a written record of its consideration of all written and oral submissions contained in the rulemaking record respecting a proposed rule.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2001, ch. 295, § 2; 2019, ch. 472, § 15, effective May 2, 2019.

Collateral References.

Construction and Application of Rule of Necessity Providing that Administrative or Quasi-judicial Officer Is Not Disqualified to Determine a Matter Because of Bias or Personal Interest if Case Cannot Be Heard Otherwise, 28 A.L.R.6th 175.

28-32-12.
Comment period.

The agency or commission shall allow, after the conclusion of any rulemaking hearing, a comment period of at least ten days during which data, views, or arguments concerning the proposed rulemaking will be received by the agency or commission and made a part of the rulemaking record to be considered by the agency or commission.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2005, ch. 287, § 2; 2019, ch. 472, § 16, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-13.
Substantial compliance with rulemaking procedure.

A rule is invalid unless adopted in substantial compliance with this chapter. However, inadvertent failure to supply any person with a notice required by section 28-32-10 does not invalidate a rule. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of section 28-32-42, an action to contest the validity of a rule on the grounds of noncompliance with this chapter may not be commenced more than two years after the effective date of the rule.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-14.
Attorney general review of rules.

Every rule proposed by any administrative agency must be submitted to the attorney general for an opinion as to its legality before final adoption, and the attorney general promptly shall furnish each such opinion. The attorney general may not approve any rule as to legality when the rule exceeds the statutory authority of the agency or is written in a manner that is not concise or easily understandable or when the procedural requirements for adoption of the rule in this chapter are not substantially met. The attorney general shall advise an agency of any revision or rewording of a rule necessary to correct objections as to legality.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12.

28-32-15.
Filing of rules for publication — Effective date of rules.

A copy of each rule adopted by an administrative agency or the commission, a copy of each written comment and a written summary of each oral comment on the rule, and the attorney general’s opinion on the rule, if any, must be filed by the adopting agency or commission with the legislative council for publication of the rule in the North Dakota Administrative Code.

Nonemergency rules approved by the attorney general as to legality, adopted by an administrative agency or the commission, filed with the legislative council, and not voided or held for consideration by the administrative rules committee become effective according to the following schedule:

Rules filed with the legislative council from August second through November first become effective on the immediately succeeding January first.

Rules filed with the legislative council from November second through February first become effective on the immediately succeeding April first.

Rules filed with the legislative council from February second through May first become effective on the immediately succeeding July first.

Rules filed with the legislative council from May second through August first become effective on the immediately succeeding October first.

If publication is delayed for any reason other than action of the administrative rules committee, nonemergency rules, unless otherwise provided, become effective when publication would have occurred but for the delay.

A rule held for consideration by the administrative rules committee becomes effective on the first effective date of rules under the schedule in subdivision a following the meeting at which that rule is reconsidered by the committee.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2001, ch. 297, § 2; 2005, ch. 287, § 3; 2009, ch. 277, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 24; 2019, ch. 472, § 17, effective May 2, 2019.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota Supreme Court Review, 77 N.D. L. Rev. 589 (2001).

28-32-16.
Petition for reconsideration of rule — Hearing.

Any person substantially interested in the effect of a rule adopted by an administrative agency or the commission may petition the agency or commission for a reconsideration of the rule or for an amendment or repeal of the rule. The petition must state clearly and concisely the petitioners’ alleged grounds for reconsideration or the proposed repeal or amendment of the rule. The agency or commission may grant the petitioner a public hearing on the terms and conditions the agency prescribes.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2019, ch. 472, § 18, effective May 2, 2019.

28-32-17.
Administrative rules committee objection.

If the legislative management’s administrative rules committee objects to all or any portion of a rule because the committee deems it to be unreasonable, arbitrary, capricious, or beyond the authority delegated to the adopting agency, the committee may file that objection in certified form with the legislative council. The filed objection must contain a concise statement of the committee’s reasons for its action.

The legislative council shall attach to each objection a certification of the time and date of its filing and, as soon as possible, shall transmit a copy of the objection and the certification to the agency adopting the rule in question. The legislative council also shall maintain a permanent register of all committee objections.

The legislative council shall publish an objection filed pursuant to this section in the next issue of the code supplement. In case of a filed committee objection to a rule subject to the exceptions of the definition of rule in section 28-32-01, the agency shall indicate the existence of that objection adjacent to the rule in any compilation containing that rule.

Within fourteen days after the filing of a committee objection to a rule, the adopting agency shall respond in writing to the committee. After receipt of the response, the committee may withdraw or modify its objection.

After the filing of a committee objection, the burden of persuasion is upon the agency in any action for judicial review or for enforcement of the rule to establish that the whole or portion thereof objected to is within the procedural and substantive authority delegated to the agency. If the agency fails to meet its burden of persuasion, the court shall declare the whole or portion of the rule objected to invalid and judgment must be rendered against the agency for court costs. These court costs must include a reasonable attorney’s fee and must be payable from the appropriation of the agency which adopted the rule in question.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 293, § 12; 2009, ch. 482, § 25.